nlp-tools/dict/ne_NP.dic
अख्रि/8,43
अठोट्/1,41
अड्कल्/1,41
अड्कलि/8,43
अत्याइ/8,43
अरर्याइ/8,43
अर्जाप्/1,41
अराइ/8,43
अराल्/1,41
अल्प/8,45,32
आँक्/1,41
आत्ति/8,43
आफल्/1,41
आफु/7,16,18,22,15
इन्कारि/8,43
उ/3,16
उँग्/1,41
उक्कि/8,43
उकाल्/1,41
उकेर्/1,41
उकेरि/8,43
उखाड्/1,41
उखेल्/1,41
उग्ल्याइ/8,43
उगेल्/1,41
उघाइ/8,43
उचेर्/1,41
उछिट्याइ/8,43
उजाड्/1,41
उजिलि/8,43
उठ्/1,41
उड्कि/8,43
उतार्/1,41
उद्रि/8,43
उधार्/1,41
उधिनाइ/8,43
उन्/1,41
उफ्र/8,45
उफार्/1,41
उब्राइ/8,43
उभड्/1,41
उभार्/1,41
उमठाइ/8,43
उम्/1,41
उम्ट/8,45
उम्ल/8,44
उमाल्/1,41
उमेठि/8,43
उराल्/1,41
उल्छि/8,43
उल्याइ/8,43
ऐँचाइ/8,43
ओइलि/8,43
ओकट्/1,41
ओगट्/1,41
ओझि/8,43
ओडाल्/1,41
ओथि/8,43
ओदार्/1,41
ओराल्/1,41
ओल्चि/8,43
ओल्सि/8,43
औँटर्/1,41
क/3
कक्र/8,45
कचोट्/1,41
कचोटि/8,43
कड्क/8,45
कन्/1,41
कन्याउ/8,43
कबुल्/1,41
कमाइ/8,43
करेप्/1,41
करेपाइ/8,43
कहलाइ/8,43
काँप्/1,41
काढ्/1,41
काम्/1,41
कामि/8,43
किट्/1,41
किनि/8,43
कुँड्/1,41
कुँढाइ/8,43
कुँद्/1,41
कुच्याइ/8,43
कुटाइ/8,43
कुद्/1,41
कुप्‌र्याइ/8,43
कुराइ/8,43
केर्/1,41
केराइ/8,43
कोचलि/8,43
कोच्/1,41
कोचेल्/1,41
कोतरि/8,43
कोपर्/1,41
कोप्रि/8,43
कोर्/1,41
खकार्/1,41
खकालि/8,43
खगार्/1,41
खत्काइ/8,43
खतेर्/1,41
खप्/1,41
खप्काइ/8,43
खबटि/8,43
खराइ/8,43
खस्/1,41
खसालि/8,43
ख्याँच्/1,41
खाँचि/8,43
खाप्/1,41
खार्/1,41
खिँचि/8,43
खिच्/1,41
खियाइ/8,43
खिल्/1,41
खुँद्/1,41
खुटाइ/8,43
खुम्च्याइ/8,43
खुरि/8,43
खुल्/1,41
खुस्कि/8,43
खेप्/1,41
खेल्/1,41
खेलि/8,43
खोक्/1,41
खोकाइ/8,43
खोतर्/1,41
खोत्ति/8,43
खोदल्/1,41
खोप्/1,41
खोल्सि/8,43
खोस्/1,41
खोस्र/8,45
खौराइ/8,43
गँसाइ/8,43
गठर्याइ/8,43
गढ्/1,41
गद्काइ/8,43
गमाइ/8,43
गल्/1,41
गलि/8,43
गाभ्/1,41
गालि/8,43
गिजोल्/1,41
गिराइ/8,43
गुज्र/8,45
गुड्/8,45
गुथ्/1,41
गुथाइ/8,43
गुमाइ/8,43
गोडाइ/8,43
गोद्/1,41
घचेटि/8,43
घबराइ/8,43
घस्/1,41
घस्काइ/8,43
घसाइ/8,43
घिच्/1,41
घिच्चि/8,43
घिस्र/8,45
घुइँक्याइ/8,43
घुम्‌र्याइ/8,43
घुम्/1,41
घुस्याइ/8,43
घुसार्/1,41
घेराइ/8,43
घोट्/1,41
घोत्ल्याइ/8,43
घोलाइ/8,43
ङ्याच्/1,41
चकारि/8,43
चढि/8,43
चर्चरि/8,43
चल्/1,41,32
चस्काइ/8,43
च्याप्टि/8,43
चाख्/1,41
चास्/1,41
चासि/8,43
चिच्याइ/8,43
चिथर्/1,41
चिनि/8,43
चिम्ल्याइ/8,43
चिमोट्/1,41
चिरि/8,43
चुँडाइ/8,43
चुँडाल्/1,41
चुक्याइ/8,43
चुठि/8,43
चुड्/1,41
चुभुर्कि/8,43
चुर्रि/8,43
चुहाइ/8,43
चेत्/1,41
चेप्रि/8,43
चोखि/8,43
चोप्/1,41
चोबलि/8,43
छँदाइ/8,43
छट्काइ/8,43
छन्क/8,45
छर्/1,41
छर्क/8,45
छल्याइ/8,43
छाँदि/8,43
छाड्/1,41
छाम्/1,41
छासि/8,43
छिँवल्/1,41
छिटि/8,43
छिन्/1,41
छिरल्/1,41
छिल्काइ/8,43
छु/8,45
छेक्/1,41
छेकाइ/8,43
छेर्/1,41
छोपि/8,43
छोस्/1,41
ज/3
जपाइ/8,43
जम्/1,41
जाकि/8,43
जाग्/1,41
जिस्क्याइ/8,43
जुट्/1,41
जेलि/8,43
जोख्/1,41
झट्कार्/1,41
झट्काराइ/8,43
झप्काइ/8,43
झर्/1,41
झल्काइ/8,43
झान्/1,41
झिकि/8,43
झिजोल्/1,41
झुन्डि/8,43
झेल्/1,41
झेलि/8,43
टक्राइ/8,43
टप्/1,41
टरि/8,43
टाँक्/1,41
टाल्/1,41
टालि/8,43
टुङ्ग्याइ/8,43
टेक्/1,41
टोकाइ/8,43
टोपल्/1,41
ठम्याइ/8,43
ठ्याँक्/1,41
ठाडि/8,43
ठास्/1,41
ठेकाइ/8,43
ठोक्/1,41
डकाइ/8,43
डग्/1,41
डाँक्/1,41
डाँकि/8,43
डाम्/1,41
डुलि/8,43
डोब्/1,41
ढल्काइ/8,43
ढाक्/1,41
ढुक्/1,41
ढोगि/8,43
तँ/6,16
तक्/1,41
तड्पाइ/8,43
तर्/1,41
तर्क/8,45
ताछि/8,43
तात्/1,41
तिखार्/1,41
तिमि/7,16,18
तुनि/8,43
तोक्/1,41
तोकाइ/8,43
थचार्/1,41
थचारि/8,43
थलि/8,43
थाप्/1,41
थुँग्/1,41
थुति/8,43
थुपार्/1,41
थोपार्/1,41
दँजाइ/8,43
दप्काइ/8,43
दल्/1,41
दलि/8,43
दाव्/1,41
दुखि/8,43
दोबार्/1,41
दौडाइ/8,43
धपेड्/1,41
धम्क्याइ/8,43
धाइ/8,43
धान्/1,41
धुर्याइ/8,43
धोक्/1,41
नङ्ङि/8,43
नाथ्/1,41
निक्लि/8,43
निकाल्/1,41
निचर्/1,41
निथराइ/8,43
निफन्/1,41
निब्ट/8,45
नियाल्/1,41
निलि/8,43
नेपर्/1,41
नेपरि/8,43
पग्रि/8,43
पगाल्/1,41
पछार्/1,41
पट्काइ/8,43
पड्कार्/1,41
पढि/8,43
परगेल्/1,41
पर्ख/8,45
पस्/1,41
पस्क/8,45
पहिर/8,45
पाँज्/1,41
पार्/1,41
पारि/8,43
पिछड्/1,41
पिल्याइ/8,43
पिसोल्/1,41
पुत्ताइ/8,43
पुर्/1,41
पैठि/8,43
पोख्/1,41
पोस्/1,41
फँकाइ/8,43
फतरि/8,43
फल्/1,41
फलाकि/8,43
फाँक्/1,41
फाट्/1,41
फिँजाइ/8,43
फिट्/1,41
फुक्/1,41
फुक्ल/8,44
फुर्/1,41
फुरि/8,43
फेटि/8,43
फोड्/1,41
बक्साइ/8,43
बग्/1,41
बजार्/1,41
बझाइ/8,43
बढार्/1,41
बद्लाइ/8,43
बर्/1,41
बराइ/8,43
बहकि/8,43
बाँच्/1,41
बाछि/8,43
बार्/1,41
बिगार्/1,41
बिङ्ठ्याइ/8,43
बित्/1,41,33
बिथोलि/8,43
बियाँल्/1,41
बिल्झ/8,45
बुझाइ/8,43
बुड्/1,41
बेर्/1,41
बेरि/8,43
बोर्/1,41
बौराइ/8,43
भटार्/1,41
भत्क/8,45
भल्कि/8,43
भाँच्/1,41
भास्/1,41
भिडि/8,43
भिर्/1,41
भुटाइ/8,43
भुल्/1,41
भोगाइ/8,43
म/6,16
मढ्/1,41
मढि/8,43
मर्क/8,45
मल्/1,41
मसिनि/8,43
माड्/1,41
मिच्/1,41
मिल्काइ/8,43
मुड्/1,41
मुढ्याइ/8,43
मुसुमुसाइ/8,43
मोड्/1,41
य/3
रँगि/8,43
रँगेल्/1,41
रङ्/1,41
रङेलि/8,43
रम्/1,41
रमाइ/8,43
रिँध्/1,41
रिङाइ/8,43
रुङ्/1,41
रुझाइ/8,43
रेट्/1,41
रोज्/1,41
रोजि/8,43
लग्/1,41
लच्कि/8,43
लछेर्/1,41
लत्‌र्याइ/8,43
लम्ब्याइ/8,43
ललकार्/1,41
ला/8,45
लिप्/1,41
लुँड्याइ/8,43
लुस्याइ/8,43
लेप्/1,41
लोत्‌र्याइ/8,43
लोपार्/1,41
वाकि/8,43
सँगेट्/1,41
सँधाइ/8,43
सँभाल्/1,41
सङालि/8,43
सज्/1,41
सन्क/8,45
सम्मि/8,43
समात्/1,41
सराप्/1,41
सरि/8,43
साँच्/1,41
साइ/8,43
साप्/1,41
सिउर्/1,41
सिटाइ/8,43
सुँघ्/1,41
सुझ्/8,45
सुन्/1,41
सुभि/8,43
सुल्कि/8,43
सुसेल्/1,41
हग्/1,41
हगाइ/15,22,8,43
हति/8,43
हपार्/1,41
हल्ल/8,44
हाँप्/1,41
हामि/7,16,18
हाल्/1,41
हिँडि/8,43
हुच्चाइ/8,43
हुरेल्/1,41
हेल्/1,41
होचि/8,43
घुल्/1,41
धुक्/1,41
भिकाइ/8,43
चलमलाइ/8,43
अगाल्/1,41
खात्/1,41
छढ्कार्/1,41
थुङ्/1,41
धुत्/1,41
फिस्/1,41
बिउल्/1,41
मोहोर्/1,41
सेच्/1,41
हाप्/1,41
गुहार्/1,41
घँचेट्/1,41
बक्/1,41
फर्माइ/8,43
चौबल्/1,41
खौप्/1,41
घड्/1,41
अोढ्/1,41
सुघ्/1,41
अचेट्याइ/8,43
आट्/1,41
काप्/1,41
कापि/8,43
खदार्/1,41
खाचि/8,43
खुड्/1,41
गासि/8,43
गिड्/1,41
चुडि/8,43
छाट्/1,41
जाच्/1,41
जाचि/8,43
झिजोल्/1,41
टुइक/8,45
ठ्याक्/1,41
डाड/8,45
ढाट्/1,41
त/6,16
पसाग्याइ/8,43
पाज्/1,41
फ्याक्/1,41
फाजि/8,43
फाद्/1,41
ब्युझाइ/8,43
बाच्/1,41
भडाइ/8,43
भाच्/1,41
राध्/1,41
रुधाइ/8,43
सगाल्/1,41
सभल्/1,41
सभारि/8,43
साध्/1,41
हकाइ/8,43
हाक्/1,41
हुडल्/1,41
छास्/1,41
डाट्/1,41
गाड्/1,41
